Nevada, session 83, AB437.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 691A of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 18, inclusive,
of this act.
Sec. 2. As used in sections 2 to 18, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
in sections 3 to 8, inclusive, of this act have the meanings ascribed
to them in those sections.
Sec. 3. “Association” means the Fair Access to Insurance
Requirements Plan Association created by section 9 of this act.
Sec. 4. “Association member” means any authorized insurer
that offers or sells any property insurance or commercial property
insurance in this State.
Sec. 5. “Board” means the Board of Directors of the
Association created by section 10 of this act.
Sec. 6. “Commercial property insurance” means insurance
against direct loss to commercial property, including, without
limitation, buildings and the contents of buildings, which results
from the perils of fire or perils covered under extended coverage
insurance, vandalism or malicious mischief. The term does not
include commercial vehicle insurance or farm insurance.
Sec. 7. “FAIR Plan” means the Fair Access to Insurance
Requirements Plan established by the Board pursuant to section
11 of this act.
Sec. 8. “Property insurance” means insurance against direct
loss to residential property, including, without limitation, buildings
and the contents of buildings, which results from the perils of fire
or perils covered under extended coverage insurance, vandalism
or malicious mischief. The term does not include vehicle
insurance or farm insurance.
Sec. 9. 1. There is hereby created the Fair Access to
Insurance Requirements Plan Association, which is a nonprofit
unincorporated public entity. All Association members are and
remain members of the Association as a condition of the authority
of each Association member to transact insurance or reinsurance
in this State.
2. The Association shall:
-
*AB437_R1*

– 3 –
(a) Exercise its powers through the Board; and
(b) Perform its functions under a plan of operation established
and approved pursuant to section 12 of this act.
3. The Association is established to provide property
insurance coverage and commercial property insurance coverage
when such coverage is not otherwise available from an authorized
insurer. The Association:
(a) Shall establish, offer and maintain a policy of property
insurance and a policy of commercial property insurance in
accordance with the requirements of the FAIR Plan.
(b) Shall assess and share among Association members, on a
fair and equitable basis, all expenses, income and losses based on
the written premium of each Association member for property
insurance and commercial property insurance consistent with
sections 2 to 18, inclusive, of this act.
(c) May issue policies of property insurance and commercial
property insurance, reinsure any such policies in whole or in part,
cede any such reinsurance or transfer risk to other capital
markets.
(d) Shall establish an Internet website available to the public
which includes information about the FAIR Plan. The Internet
website must include a toll-free telephone number that a person
may use to obtain information about the FAIR Plan.
Sec. 10. 1. There is hereby created the Board of Directors
of the Association, as the governing body of the Association and to
administer the FAIR Plan, consisting of the following 12 members
appointed by the Governor:
(a) Two members representing mutual insurers that write
property insurance in this State;
(b) Two members representing stock insurers that write
property insurance in this State;
(c) One member representing a trade association based in this
State that represents insurers of various property interests;
(d) One member representing a trade association based in this
State that represents independent agents who are licensed to write
property and casualty insurance in this State;
(e) One member who is a producer of insurance licensed to
write property and casualty insurance in this State;
(f) Two members, one of whom resides in Northern Nevada
and one of which resides in Southern Nevada, representing the
interests of consumers and, to the extent practicable, representing
consumer advocacy organizations; and
(g) Three members, one of whom is a fire chief in Eastern
Nevada, one of whom is a fire chief in Northern Nevada and one
of whom is a fire chief in Southern Nevada.
-
*AB437_R1*

– 4 –
2. The term of each member of the Board appointed pursuant
to paragraphs (a) to (g), inclusive, of subsection 1 is 3 years. A
member may be reappointed for up to three additional terms of 3
years in the same manner as the original appointment. A vacancy
occurring in the membership of the Board must be filled in the
same manner as the original appointment.
3. The Board shall annually elect a Chair from among its
members.
4. The Board shall meet at least annually and may meet at
such further times as deemed necessary by the Chair. The Board
shall adopt rules for its own management and governance.
5. The Board may, on its own initiative or at the request of
the Commissioner, and subject to the approval of the
Commissioner, amend the FAIR Plan.
6. On or before April 1, 2027, and on or before each April 1
thereafter, the Board shall submit to the Commissioner, in the
form and manner determined by the Commissioner, a report
concerning the FAIR Plan during the preceding calendar year.
The report must include information concerning:
(a) The financial condition of the FAIR Plan;
(b) The number of policies and the coverage available through
the FAIR Plan;
(c) The number and types of claims made under the FAIR
Plan; and
(d) A description of the sufficiency of coverage under the
FAIR Plan and the sufficiency of finances of the FAIR Plan.
7. In addition to the requirements of subsection 6, the
Commissioner may require the Board to submit quarterly reports
or may examine the affairs of the Association if the Commissioner
determines that such action is necessary to ensure the continued
solvency of the FAIR Plan.
Sec. 11. 1. The Board shall establish the Fair Access to
Insurance Requirements Plan, in accordance with the
requirements of sections 2 to 18, inclusive, of this act, and any
regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
2. Rates for the FAIR Plan must:
(a) Not be excessive, inadequate or unfairly discriminatory;
(b) Be actuarially sound so that revenue generated from
premiums is adequate to pay for expected losses, expenses and
taxes;
(c) Reflect the investment income of the FAIR Plan; and
(d) Reflect the cost of reinsurance or other capital risk transfer
markets.
3. All rate filing documentation and review requirements set
forth in this title apply to the FAIR Plan.
-
*AB437_R1*

– 5 –
Sec. 12. 1. On or before July 1, 2026, the Board shall
establish and submit to the Commissioner a plan of operation for
the FAIR Plan which satisfies the requirements of sections 2 to 18,
inclusive, of this act. The plan of operation and any amendments
to the plan of operation become effective upon written approval of
the Commissioner.
2. The plan of operation for the FAIR Plan must provide for:
(a) The lines of insurance coverage which are to be written.
(b) Coverage limits for:
(1) Property insurance, in an amount which must be
$750,000 or less; and
(2) Commercial property insurance, in an amount which
must be $5,000,000 or less.
(c) The policy forms which are to be used.
(d) The perils which are to be covered.
(e) The establishment of reasonable standards for
underwriting to determine the eligibility of a risk, which must
include the requirement that coverage under the FAIR Plan is
only available if:
(1) A fire risk assessment is conducted on the property to be
covered and the property owner implements the findings and
recommendations for mitigation set forth in the assessment.
(2) During the 2 years immediately preceding the date on
which the coverage begins, not less than three authorized insurers
have declined to issue a policy of property insurance or
commercial property insurance, as applicable, which covers the
property; and
(3) During each 2-year period in which the property is
covered by the FAIR Plan, the owner of the property applies to not
less than three authorized insurers for a policy of property
insurance or commercial property insurance, as applicable, to
cover the property and each authorized insurer to which the owner
applies declines to issue such a policy.
(f) Any compensation or commission which is to be paid to a
producer of insurance who offers the FAIR Plan.
(g) Procedures for the collection of fees, including the times at
which fees will be collected, from Association members.
(h) Assessments against Association members, which must be
in the proportion that the premiums received by each assessed
Association member bear to premiums received for all assessed
Association members, for the 3 most recent calendar years for
which such information is available. As used in this paragraph,
“premiums received” means premiums received on property
insurance lines and commercial property insurance lines in this
State.
-
*AB437_R1*

– 6 –
(i) Administration of the FAIR Plan by the Board, including
any servicing agreements into which the Board may enter to
support the operations of the Association.
(j) Any other matter necessary or convenient for the purpose of
assuring fair access to the FAIR Plan.
3. If the Board fails to submit a plan of operation in
compliance with the requirements of this section, or fails to timely
submit suitable amendments to the plan of operation, the
Commissioner shall adopt regulations that are necessary to
effectuate the provisions of sections 2 to 18, inclusive, of this act.
Any regulation adopted pursuant to this subsection must, if the
Board subsequently submits a suitable plan of operation or
suitable amendments, allow the subsequent plan of operation or
amendments, if approved by the Commissioner, to supersede
regulations adopted by the Commissioner pursuant to this
subsection.
Sec. 13. 1. The Commissioner may revoke approval of all
or part of an approved plan of operation for the FAIR Plan, in
compliance with the requirements of this section, if the
Commissioner determines that the approved plan of operation is
insufficient to satisfy the requirements of sections 2 to 18,
inclusive, of this act.
2. The Commissioner shall give notice to the Board not less
than 30 days before the date on which the Commissioner intends
to revoke all or part of the plan of operation. Not later than 30
days after the date on which the Board receives notice from the
Commissioner, the Board may submit a revised plan of operation
or a revised part of a plan for operation to the Commissioner for
review and approval.
3. If the Board fails to timely submit a revised plan of
operation pursuant to subsection 2, the Commissioner may make
changes to the existing plan of operation to ensure the plan of
operation satisfies the requirements of sections 2 to 18, inclusive,
of this act. Any changes made pursuant to this subsection do not
affect the validity of a policy executed before the date on which the
changes are effective.
4. If the Board subsequently submits a suitable plan of
operation which satisfies the requirements of sections 2 to 18,
inclusive, of this act and is approved by the Commissioner, that
subsequent plan of operation must supersede any changes made
by the Commissioner pursuant to subsection 3.
Sec. 14. The Association shall not sell a policy subject to
sections 2 to 18, inclusive, of this act directly to any person or
entity. A policy of the Association may only be issued through a
producer of insurance, who shall, on behalf of a person or entity
-
*AB437_R1*

– 7 –
and as part of the submittal of an application for a policy, include
evidence of not less than three declinations of coverage for the
property at issue.
Sec. 15. 1. The Association may collect fees from
Association members to ensure sufficient revenue to start the
Association. An Association member:
(a) Who pays a fee pursuant to this subsection may recoup the
amount of the fee directly from policyholders; and
(b) Shall not increase premiums based on a fee which is
assessed pursuant to this subsection.
2. The Association may collect fees from Association
members as needed, subject to the approval of the Commissioner,
to meet the financial obligations of the Association. An
Association member:
(a) Who pays a fee pursuant to this subsection may recoup the
amount of the fee over a reasonable amount of time in the form of
a surcharge on policyholders; and
(b) Shall not increase premiums based on a fee which is
assessed pursuant to this subsection.
3. A fee collected pursuant to subsection 1 or 2 must not be
considered a premium for any purpose, including, without
limitation, for the computation of any tax on gross premium
income or any commission of a producer of insurance.
4. If the Commissioner determines at any time that the
Association is or may become unable to meet the financial
obligations of the Association, the Commissioner shall direct the
Board to assess and collect fees pursuant to subsection 2 in an
amount which is sufficient to restore the ability of the Association
to meet its obligations.
5. The Association may abate or defer, in whole or in part, a
fee assessed to an Association member if, in the opinion of the
Board, payment of the fee would endanger the solvency of the
Association member. The Association may assess the amount of
any fee or part of a fee which is abated or deferred pursuant to
this subsection against other Association members.
Sec. 16. If an Association member fails to timely pay a fee or
comply with the plan of operation pursuant to sections 2 to 18,
inclusive, of this act, the Commissioner may:
1. After notice and a hearing, suspend or revoke the
certificate of authority to transact insurance or reinsurance in this
State of the Association member.
2. Impose a fine on the Association member, in an amount
which must be the greater of $5,000 or the amount of the fee plus
interest and the costs of enforcement by the Commissioner.
-
*AB437_R1*

– 8 –
Sec. 17. The Commissioner may adopt regulations to carry
out the provisions of sections 2 to 18, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 18. A final action or order of the Commissioner issued
pursuant to sections 2 to 18, inclusive, of this act is subject to
judicial review in a court of competent jurisdiction pursuant to the
procedure provided in chapter 233B of NRS for contested cases.
Sec. 19. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10 of this
act, as soon as practicable on or after October 1, 2025, the Governor
shall appoint the members of the Board of Directors of the Fair
Access to Insurance Requirements Plan Association as follows:
1. For the members identified in paragraph (a) of subsection 1
of section 10 of this act, one member to an initial term of 1 year and
one member to an initial term of 3 years;
2. For the members identified in paragraph (b) of subsection 1
of section 10 of this act, one member to an initial term of 1 year and
one member to an initial term of 3 years;
3. For the member identified in paragraph (c) of subsection 1
of section 10 of this act, to an initial term of 2 years;
4. For the members identified in paragraphs (d) and (e) of
subsection 1 of section 10 of this act, to initial terms of 1 year;
5. For the members identified in paragraph (f) of subsection 1
of section 10 of this act, one member to an initial term of 2 years
and one member to an initial term of 3 years; and
6. For the members identified in paragraph (g) of subsection 1
of section 10 of this act, to an initial term of 3 years.
H
-
*AB437_R1*